Idaho, session 2025, H0023.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 49-305, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-305. INSTRUCTION PERMITS -- COMMERCIAL LEARNER'S PERMIT --
TEMPORARY CONDITIONAL LICENSES -- MOTORCYCLE ENDORSEMENT INSTRUCTION PER-
MIT. (1) Upon passage of the required knowledge tests appropriate for the
vehicle being operated, the department may issue a commercial learner's
permit for the type of vehicle(s) the person will be operating or a class D
instruction permit for a class D motor vehicle. Applicants, while in immedi-
ate possession of a commercial learner's permit, may drive a motor vehicle
upon on the highways for a period of up to one (1) year, and applicants. Ap-
plicants with a class D instruction permit may drive a motor vehicle upon
on the highways for a period of up to one hundred eighty (180) days one (1)
year or as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection for certain class
D instruction permits. That person must be accompanied by an adult driver
eighteen (18) years of age or older who holds a valid driver's license appro-
priate for the vehicle being operated and who is actually occupying a seat
beside the driver. Unless otherwise provided, a class D instruction permit
will be valid for one hundred eighty (180) days and may be renewed one (1)
time without requiring the permit holder to retake and pass the required
knowledge tests for that class of permit, provided the knowledge tests are
less than one (1) year old.
(a) Any person under the age of seventeen (17) years who has success-
fully completed an approved driver's training course and has satisfied
the requirements of a class D supervised instruction permit, or any
person who has reached the age of seventeen (17) years, may apply for
a class D instruction permit. Any person applying for any class D in-
struction permit or driving privileges who is under the age of eighteen
(18) years shall be in compliance with school attendance requirements
of section 49-303A, Idaho Code.
(b) If a person reaches the age of seventeen (17) years while operat-
ing a class D vehicle with a class D supervised instruction permit, and
such class D supervised instruction permit becomes a class D instruc-
tion permit as provided in section 49-307, Idaho Code, then such class


D instruction permit shall expire five (5) days after the permittee's
eighteenth birthday.
(c) Any person who has reached the age of eighteen (18) years, holds a
valid Idaho class D driver's license, and has at least one (1) year of
driving experience may apply for a commercial learner's permit.
(d) The department shall not issue a hazardous material endorsement on
any commercial learner's permit.
(2) The department may, at its discretion, issue a temporary
conditional class D driver's license to an applicant for a class D driver's
license permitting him to operate a motor vehicle while the department is
completing its investigation and determination of all facts relative to the
applicant's right to receive a driver's license. The temporary conditional
license may be canceled at the department's discretion at any time after
issuance. The temporary conditional license must be in the applicant's im-
mediate possession while operating a motor vehicle, and it shall be invalid
when the applicant's driver's license has been issued or for good cause has
been refused.
(3) A certified copy of an applicant's birth certificate shall be re-
quired before a class D driver's license or class D instruction permit will
be issued.
(4) The department may issue a motorcycle endorsement instruction per-
mit to an applicant who has a valid driver's license and who has success-
fully completed the motorcycle rider's knowledge test and paid the appropri-
ate fees. The permit entitles the applicant, while having the permit in his
immediate possession, to operate a motorcycle upon on the highways for a pe-
riod not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days. The motorcycle endorsement
instruction permit may be renewed one (1) time without the requirement to re-
take and pass the motorcycle rider's knowledge test if the test is less than
one (1) year old one (1) year. If the permittee passes the skills test for a
motorcycle endorsement within one hundred eighty (180) days of issuance the
validity period of the motorcycle endorsement instruction permit, he shall
not be required to pay the motorcycle endorsement fee. A person holding a mo-
torcycle instruction permit shall not carry any passenger while operating a
motorcycle, shall not operate a motorcycle except during the hours of day-
light only, and shall not operate a motorcycle upon on any interstate highway
system. A violation of the conditions of a motorcycle endorsement instruc-
tion permit is an infraction. The department shall cancel the permit whether
or not such violation results in conviction of the infraction.
SECTION 2. That Section 49-306, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-306. APPLICATION FOR DRIVER'S LICENSE, INSTRUCTION PERMIT,
COMMERCIAL LEARNER'S PERMIT OR RESTRICTED SCHOOL ATTENDANCE DRIVING PER-
MIT. (1) Every application for any instruction permit, restricted school
attendance driving permit, or driver's license shall be made on a form
furnished by the department and shall be verified by the applicant before
a person authorized to administer oaths. Officers and employees of the
department, agents authorized by the department, and sheriffs and their
deputies are authorized to administer the oaths without charge.


(2) Every application for a permit, extension, driver's license, or
knowledge test shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable fee pursuant to this
subsection. Fee portions identified as going to the current expense fund
shall be retained by the issuing entity. If the issuing entity is the depart-
ment or an agent authorized by the department, other than the county, such
fee portion shall be deposited in the state highway account. All other re-
maining fee portions shall be remitted to the state treasurer. If the fee is
collected by a county, all remaining fee portions shall be paid over to the
county treasurer and the county treasurer shall remit such fees to the state
treasurer not less than monthly. The state treasurer shall immediately al-
locate such fees in accordance with the schedule identified following each
fee:
(a) Class A, B, C (4-year) license with endorsements --
age 21 years and older ........................................$40.00
(i) $5.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $2.00 to emergency medical services fund II;
(iii) $4.00 to emergency medical services fund III;
(iv) $28.00 to the state highway account; and
(v) $1.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(b) Class A, B, C (8-year) license with endorsements --
age 21 to 63 years and older ...................................$60.00
(i) $5.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $4.00 to emergency medical services fund II;
(iii) $8.00 to emergency medical services fund III;
(iv) $41.00 to the state highway account; and
(v) $2.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(c) Class A, B, C (3-year) license with endorsements --
age 18 to 21 years ............................................$30.00
(i) $5.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $1.50 to emergency medical services fund II;
(iii) $3.00 to emergency medical services fund III;
(iv) $19.50 to the state highway account; and
(v) $1.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(d) Class A, B, C (1-year) license with endorsements -- age
20 years ....................................................$15.00
(i) $5.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $0.50 to emergency medical services fund II;
(iii) $1.00 to emergency medical services fund III;
(iv) $8.16 to the state highway account; and
(v) $0.34 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(e) Class D (3-year) license -- age 15 to 18 years or
age 18 to 21 years ............................................$30.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $1.50 to emergency medical services fund II;
(iii) $3.00 to emergency medical services fund III;
(iv) $4.00 to the driver training fund;
(v) $10.50 to the highway distribution account; and
(vi) $1.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(f) Class D (1-year) license -- age 17 to or 20 years ............$20.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;


(ii) $0.50 to emergency medical services fund II;
(iii) $1.00 to emergency medical services fund III;
(iv) $1.33 to the driver training fund;
(v) $6.83 to the highway distribution account; and
(vi) $0.34 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(g) Class D (4-year) license -- age 21 years and
older .......................................................$35.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $2.00 to emergency medical services fund II;
(iii) $4.00 to emergency medical services fund III;
(iv) $5.30 to the driver training fund;
(v) $12.70 to the highway distribution account; and
(vi) $1.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(h) Class D (8-year) or class A, B, C license with
endorsements -- age 21 to 63 years .............................$60.00
(i) $15.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $4.00 to emergency medical services fund II;
(iii) $8.00 to emergency medical services fund III;
(iv) $10.60 to the driver training fund;
(v) $20.40 to the highway distribution account; and
(vi) $2.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(i) Commercial learner's permit ..............................$29.00
(i) $5.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $4.00 to emergency medical services fund III; and
(iii) $20.00 to the state highway account;
(j) Class D instruction permit and supervised instruction
permit ......................................................$20.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $2.60 to the driver training fund; and
(iii) $7.40 to the highway distribution account;
(k) Duplicate driver's license or permit ......................$20.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $2.60 to the driver training fund; and
(iii) $7.40 to the highway distribution account;
(l) Driver's license extension ...............................$10.00
(i) $2.60 to the driver training account; and
(ii) $7.40 to the state highway account;
(m) License classification change (upgrade)...................$30.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund; and
(ii) $20.00 to the state highway account;
(n) Endorsement addition ....................................$20.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund; and
(ii) $10.00 to the state highway account;
(o) Class A, B, C skills tests .................. not more than $200.00
(i) $10.00 to the state highway account; and
(ii) Remainder retained by entity administering the test;
(p) Class D skills test ......................... not more than $35.00
(i) $6.50 to the state highway account; and
(ii) Remainder retained by entity administering the test;
(q) Motorcycle endorsement skills test (amount charged retained by


entity administering the test).................. not more than $25.00;
(r) Knowledge test (fee retained by the entity administering
the test)....................................................$5.00;
(s) Seasonal driver's license ................................$44.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $2.00 to emergency medical services fund II;
(iii) $4.00 to emergency medical services fund III; and
(iv) $28.00 to the state highway account;
(t) Onetime motorcycle "M" endorsement .......................$15.00
(i) $2.50 to the current expense fund; and
(ii) $12.50 to the state highway account;
(u) Motorcycle endorsement instruction permit ................$15.00
(i) $2.50 to the current expense fund; and
(ii) $12.50 to the state highway account;
(v) Restricted driving permit or restricted school attendance
driving permit (fee to the state highway account) .............$60.00.
(3) The fee for any electronic driver's license renewal allowed pur-
suant to section 49-319(10), Idaho Code, shall be five dollars ($5.00) less
than the applicable application fee prescribed in subsection (2) of this
section. This fee reduction shall be accounted for by subtracting five dol-
lars ($5.00) from the portion of fees retained by the department.
(4) A person who applies for a driver's license or a driver's license
renewal may designate a voluntary contribution of two dollars ($2.00) for
the purpose of promoting and supporting organ donation. Such a contribution
shall be treated as a voluntary contribution to the organ donation contribu-
tion fund created in section 49-2447, Idaho Code, and not as a driver's li-
cense fee. Each voluntary contribution shall be deposited into the organ do-
nation contribution fund created in section 49-2447, Idaho Code.
(5) Every application shall state the applicant's true and full name,
date of birth, sex, declaration of Idaho residency, Idaho residence address
and mailing address if different, height, weight, hair color, eye color, and
social security number as verified by the social security administration.
If an applicant has submitted an application pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 58, title 19, Idaho Code, then the applicant may state, in his or
her application pursuant to this section, the applicant's alternative Idaho
mailing address in place of his or her Idaho residence address and mail-
ing address. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 49-303(13), Idaho
Code, an applicant for a nondomiciled class A, B or C driver's license or
nondomiciled commercial learner's permit having residency in a state that
is prohibited from issuing class A, B or C driver's licenses or commercial
learner's permits, as provided in 49 CFR 384, is excepted from providing
proof of Idaho residency and an Idaho mailing address.
(a) The requirement that an applicant provide a social security number
as verified by the social security administration shall apply only to
applicants who have been assigned a social security number.
(b) An applicant who has not been assigned a social security number
shall:
(i) Present written verification from the social security admin-
istration that the applicant has not been assigned a social secu-
rity number; and


(ii) Submit a birth certificate, passport or other documentary
evidence issued by an entity other than a state or the United
States; and
(iii) Submit such proof as the department may require that the ap-
plicant is lawfully present in the United States.
A driver's license, commercial learner's permit or any instruction
permit issued on and after January 1, 1993, shall not contain an appli-
cant's social security number. Applications on file shall be exempt
from disclosure except as provided in sections 49-202, 49-203, 49-203A
and 49-204, Idaho Code.
(c) Every application for a class A, B or C license shall state where the
applicant has been licensed for the preceding ten (10) years and under
which of the following driving categories the applicant will operate:
(i) Non-excepted interstate. The applicant operates or expects
to operate in interstate commerce and is required to provide a med-
ical examiner's certificate;
(ii) Excepted interstate. The applicant operates or expects to
operate in interstate commerce, but engages exclusively in trans-
portation or operations excepted by the federal motor carrier
safety administration from all or parts of the qualification re-
quirements of federal motor carrier safety regulation 49, part
391, and is therefore not required to provide a medical examiner's
certificate;
(iii) Non-excepted intrastate. The applicant operates only in
intrastate commerce and is subject to and meets all Idaho driver
qualification requirements and the applicable parts of federal
motor carrier safety regulation 49, part 391, and is required to
provide a medical examiner's certificate; or
(iv) Excepted intrastate. The applicant operates in intrastate
commerce, but engages exclusively in exempted transportation or
operations as listed in section 67-2901B(2), Idaho Code, and the
applicable parts of federal motor carrier safety regulation 49,
part 391, and is therefore not required to provide a medical exam-
iner's certificate.
All applications shall also state whether the applicant has previously
been licensed as a driver and, if so, when and by what state or country
and whether a driver's license or privileges have ever been suspended,
revoked, denied, disqualified, canceled or refused and, if so, the
date of and reason for the suspension, revocation, denial, disquali-
fication, cancellation or refusal and the applicant's oath that all
information is correct as signified by the applicant's signature.
(d) The applicant must submit proof of identity and citizenship sta-
tus acceptable to the examiner or the department and date of birth as
set forth in a certified copy of his birth certificate. When a certified
copy of his birth certificate or a delayed birth certificate is impossi-
ble to obtain from a vital statistics agency, another government-issued
document may be submitted that provides satisfactory evidence of a per-
son's full legal name and date of birth acceptable to the examiner or the
department.


(e) Every applicant for a class A, B or C driver's license or commer-
cial learner's permit shall provide proof of United States citizenship
or lawful permanent residency in the United States upon application for
issuance, transfer, upgrade or renewal, unless the applicant's driving
record already contains documentation confirming United States citi-
zenship or lawful permanent residency. Every applicant for a nondomi-
ciled class A, B or C driver's license or commercial learner's permit
domiciled in a foreign country must provide an unexpired employment au-
thorization document issued by the department of homeland security or
an unexpired foreign passport accompanied by an approved I-94 form doc-
umenting the applicant's most recent admittance into the United States.
(f) Individuals required to register in compliance with section 3 of
the federal military selective service act, 50 U.S.C. App. 451 et seq.,
as amended, shall be provided an opportunity to fulfill such registra-
tion requirements in conjunction with an application for a driver's li-
cense, commercial learner's permit or instruction permit. Any regis-
tration information so supplied shall be transmitted by the department
to the selective service system.
(6) Whenever an application is received from a person previously li-
censed in another jurisdiction, the department shall request a copy of the
driver's record from the other jurisdiction and shall contact the national
driver register. When received, the driver's record from the previous ju-
risdiction shall become a part of the driver's record in this state with the
same force and effect as though entered on the driver's record in this state
in the original instance.
(7) Whenever the department receives a request for a driver's record
from another licensing jurisdiction, the record shall be forwarded without
charge.
(8) The department shall contact and notify the commercial driver li-
cense information system of the proposed application for a class A, B or C
driver's license or commercial learner's permit to ensure identification of
the person and to obtain clearance to issue the license.
(9) The department shall request information from the drug and alco-
hol clearinghouse to determine whether an applicant for any class A, B, or C
driver's license or commercial learner's permit is eligible for the creden-
tial.
(10) A contractor administering a class A, B, or C skills test may col-
lect an additional fee for the use of the contractor's vehicle for the skills
test.
(11) The department may issue seasonal class B or C driver's licenses to
drivers who are employees of agri-chemical businesses, custom harvesters,
farm retail outlets and suppliers, and livestock feeders that:
(a) Will be valid only for driving commercial vehicles that normally
require class B or C commercial driver's licenses;
(b) Will be valid for seasonal periods that begin on the date of is-
suance and that are not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days in a
twelve (12) month period;
(c) May be obtained only twice in a driver's lifetime;
(d) Are valid only within a one-hundred-fifty (150) mile radius of the
place of business or farm being serviced; and


(e) Will be valid only in conjunction with valid Idaho class D driver's
licenses.
(12) The department may issue seasonal class B or C driver's licenses to
drivers who:
(a) Have not violated the single license provisions of applicable fed-
eral regulations;
(b) Have not had any license suspensions, revocations or cancella-
tions;
(c) Have not had any convictions in any vehicle for any offense listed
in section 49-335(1) or (2), Idaho Code, or any one (1) serious traffic
offense;
(d) Have at least one (1) year of driving experience with a class D or
equivalent license in any type of motor vehicle; and
(e) Are at least sixteen (16) years old.
SECTION 3. That Section 49-319, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-319. EXPIRATION AND RENEWAL OF DRIVER'S LICENSE. (1) Every noncom-
mercial Idaho driver's license issued to a driver shall expire and be renew-
able as follows:
(a) For drivers twenty-one (21) years of age or older, the driver's li-
cense shall expire on the licensee's birthday in the fourth year follow-
ing the issuance of the driver's license.
(b) At the option of the applicant, for drivers twenty-one (21) years of
age through sixty-two (62) years of age, the driver's license shall ex-
pire on the licensee's birthday in either the fourth year or the eighth
year following the issuance of the driver's license.
(c) Except for the provisions found in subsections (1)(e) and (3) of
this section, every driver's license issued to a driver under eighteen
(18) years of age shall expire five (5) days after the licensee's eigh-
teenth birthday.
(d) Except for the provisions found in subsections (1)(e) and (3) of
this section, every driver's license issued to a driver eighteen (18)
years of age but under twenty-one (21) years of age shall expire five (5)
days after the licensee's twenty-first birthday.
(e) Every driver's license that is not, as provided by law, suspended,
revoked or disqualified in this state or any other jurisdiction shall
be renewable on or before its expiration, but not more than twenty-five
(25) months before, upon application, payment of the required fee, and
satisfactory completion of the required vision screening. Notwith-
standing the provisions of this section, a person who has had his
noncommercial Idaho driver's license suspended may renew his driver's
license as provided in this section, which renewal shall be subject to
the suspension.
(2) Except for the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, at the
option of the applicant, every commercial driver's license issued to a per-
son twenty-one (21) years of age through sixty-two (62) years of age shall
expire on the licensee's birthday in the fourth or eighth year following is-
suance of the license. Any class A, B or C license issued to a person eighteen


(18), nineteen (19) or twenty (20) years of age shall expire five (5) days af-
ter the licensee's twenty-first birthday.
(3) Every driver's license issued to a person who is not a citizen or
permanent legal resident of the United States shall have an expiration date
that is the same date as the end of lawful stay in the United States, as
indicated on documents issued and verified by the department of homeland
security; however, the expiration date shall not extend beyond the expira-
tion date for the same category of license issued to citizens. Persons whose
department of homeland security documents do not state an expiration date
shall be issued a driver's license with an expiration date of one (1) year
from the date of issuance. Fees shall be in accordance with the expiration
periods and classes listed in section 49-306(1), Idaho Code.
(4) An applicant who is issued a driver's license in another jurisdic-
tion after an Idaho driver's license has been issued is not eligible for re-
newal or a duplicate of the Idaho driver's license. The applicant may apply
for a new Idaho driver's license as provided in section 49-306, Idaho Code.
(5) No knowledge test shall be required for renewal of a driver's li-
cense, except for renewal of a hazardous material endorsement. No knowl-
edge test shall be required if an applicant for a new class D Idaho driver's
license has previously held an Idaho driver's license. Appropriate knowl-
edge and skills tests shall be required for an upgrade in a driver's license
class, renewal of a hazardous material endorsement, or an endorsement addi-
tion. In the case of a name change, the applicant shall provide legal docu-
mentation to verify the change in accordance with department rules.
(6) Applicants for a hazardous material endorsement shall provide ei-
ther proof of United States citizenship or proof of lawful, permanent United
States residence and a valid federal bureau of citizenship and immigration
services alien registration number. A security background records check and
federal transportation security administration clearance shall be required
for issuance, renewal or transfer of a hazardous material endorsement in ac-
cordance with 49 CFR 383, subject to procedures established by the federal
transportation security administration.
(7) When a driver's license has been expired for fewer than twenty-five
(25) months, the renewal of the driver's license shall start from the orig-
inal date of expiration, regardless of the year in which the application
for renewal is made. If the driver's license is expired for twenty-five
(25) months or more, the applicant shall be required to take the appropriate
knowledge test(s) and skills test(s) for the class of license or endorsement
being applied for and undergo vision screening. The license shall expire
on the licensee's birthday in the fourth year following issuance of the
driver's license for drivers twenty-one (21) years of age or older, except
as otherwise provided in subsections (1)(e) and (3) of this section. At the
option of the applicant, for drivers twenty-one (21) years of age through
sixty-two (62) years of age, the renewed license shall expire on the li-
censee's birthday in either the fourth year or the eighth year following
issuance, except as otherwise provided in subsections (1)(e) and (3) of this
section.
(8)(a) If a driver's license has expired or will expire and the licensee
is temporarily out of state, except on active military duty, and the
driver's license has not, as provided by law, been suspended, revoked,


canceled, denied, refused or disqualified, the licensee may request
in writing on a form prescribed by the department an extension of the
driver's license. The request shall be accompanied by the fee fixed in
section 49-306, Idaho Code, and the extension shall be no more than a
twelve (12) month period. If the department determines that an exten-
sion of the driver's license is necessary, it may issue a license show-
ing the date to which the expired driver's license is extended. License
extensions are limited to two (2) consecutive extensions per licensee.
(b) Upon returning to the state of Idaho, the licensee shall, within ten
(10) days, apply for a renewal of the expired driver's license and sur-
render the extended license and the expired driver's license.
(c) A hazardous material endorsement cannot be extended.
(9) An Idaho driver's license issued to any person prior to serving on
active duty in the armed forces of the United States, or a member of the im-
mediate family accompanying such a person, if valid and in full force and
effect upon entering active duty, shall remain in full force and effect and
shall, upon application, be extended for a period of four (4) years as long as
active duty continues or shall be renewed upon application in person without
the requirement to take a knowledge or skills test if the Idaho driver's li-
cense expired while on active duty, if the driver's license is not suspended,
denied, disqualified, canceled or revoked, as provided by law, during the
active duty, and the driver's license shall remain in full force and effect
sixty (60) days following the date the holder is released from active duty.
(10) The department may use a mail or electronic renewal process for
class D and commercial driver's licenses based on criteria established by
rule.
(11) A seasonal driver's license is valid only for a one-hundred-eighty
(180) day period from the date of issuance. Only one (1) seasonal driver's
license may be obtained in any twelve (12) month period and may be obtained
only twice in a driver's lifetime.
(12) A person who applies for renewal of a license may request that the
notation "permanently disabled" be imprinted on the license, and the depart-
ment shall imprint "permanently disabled" on the license if:
(a) The person has a permanent disability;
(b) The person presents written certification from a licensed physi-
cian, licensed physician assistant, or licensed advanced practice
professional nurse verifying that the person's stated impairment qual-
ifies as a permanent disability as provided in section 49-117, Idaho
Code; and
(c) The department determines that the person meets the requirements
for issuance of a license as specified in section 49-313, Idaho Code.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.